Utah statutes.
48-2c-601.   General rule.

Except as provided in Section 48-2c-602, no organizer, member, manager, or employee of a company is personally liable under a judgment, decree, or order of a court, or in any other manner, for a debt, obligation, or liability of the company or for the acts or omissions of the company or of any other organizer, member, manager, or employee of the company.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

